Utah statutes.
41-1a-511.   Identification number inspection.
An application for a certificate of title for a vehicle, vessel, or outboard
motor not previously titled in this state shall be accompanied by a
certificate of identification number inspection obtained in accordance with
Section 41-1a-802, unless the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is new and
was acquired from an in-state dealer or in-state manufacturer.
